sv: Typ av skydd: Justerbart plastskydd; Justerbart tvådelat skydd; Inlägg för kantskydd; Specifikt skydd för konståkningsskridskor; Hårt plastskydd; Hockeyskridskospecifikt skydd; Soaker-skydd med mjukisdjur; Snap-on-skydd i ett stycke; Mjukt frottéskydd (soaker); Fjäderbelastat skydd; Reseskydd; Skydd med universell passform; Övrigt
pl: Styl ochraniacza: Regulowany plastikowy ochraniacz; Regulowany dwuczęściowy ochraniacz; Wkładka chroniąca krawędź; Ochraniacz do łyżew figurowych; Twardy plastikowy ochraniacz; Ochraniacz do łyżew hokejowych; Pluszowy ochraniacz (wzór zwierzęcy); Jednoczęściowy ochraniacz zatrzaskowy; Miękki ochraniacz frotte; Ochraniacz na sprężynie; Ochraniacz podróżny; Ochraniacz uniwersalny; Inne
ja: ガードスタイル: 調節可能なプラスチック製ガード; 調節可能な2ピースガード; エッジプロテクターインサート; フィギュアスケート専用ガード; 硬質プラスチック製ガード; ホッケースケート専用ガード; ぬいぐるみ風アニマルソーカ―; スナップオン1ピースガード; ソフトテリーソーカ―; スプリング式ガード; トラベルガード; ユニバーサルフィットガード; その他
sk-SK: Štýl chrániča: Nastaviteľný plastový chránič; Nastaviteľný dvojdielny chránič; Vložka na ochranu hrán; Chránič pre krasokorčule; Chránič z tvrdého plastu; Chránič pre hokejové korčule; Plyšový zvierací návlek; Nacvakávací jednodielny chránič; Mäkký froté návlek; Pružinový chránič; Cestovný chránič; Univerzálny chránič; Iné
da: Beskyttelsesstil: Justerbar plastbeskytter; Justerbar todelt beskytter; Kantbeskytterindlæg; Beskytter specifikt til kunstskøjter; Hård plastbeskytter; Beskytter specifikt til ishockeyskøjter; Plysdyrsoaker; Snap on-beskytter i ét stykke; Blød frottésoaker; Fjederbelastet beskytter; Rejsebeskytter; Beskytter med universel pasform; Andet
pt-PT: Estilo de guarda: Protetor de plástico ajustável; Protetor de duas peças ajustável; Inserção de protetor de bordos; Protetor específico para patins artísticos; Protetor de plástico rígido; Protetor específico para patins de hóquei; Capa absorvente de peluche em formato animal; Protetor de encaixe de uma peça; Capa absorvente turca macia; Protetor com mola; Protetor de viagem; Protetor de ajuste universal; Outro
fi: Suojuksen tyyli: Säädettävä muovisuoja; Säädettävä kaksiosainen suoja; Teräsuojan sisäke; Taitoluistinkohtainen suoja; Kova muovisuoja; Jääkiekkoluistinkohtainen suoja; Pehmoeläinsuoja; Napsautettava yksiosainen suoja; Pehmeä froteesuoja; Jousitettu suoja; Matkasuoja; Yleissuoja; Muu
tr: Koruyucu stili: Ayarlanabilir Plastik Koruma; Ayarlanabilir İki Parçalı Koruma; Kenar Koruma Parçası; Artistik Patenlere Özel Koruma; Sert Plastik Koruma; Hokey Patenlerine Özel Koruma; Hayvan Figürlü Pelüş Paten Kılıfı; Çıtçıtlı Tek Parça Koruma; Yumuşak Havlu Paten Kılıfı; Yaylı Koruma; Seyahat Koruması; Evrensel Uyumlu Koruma; Diğer
th: รูปแบบการปกป้อง: การ์ดพลาสติกปรับได้; การ์ดสองชิ้นปรับได้; แผ่นเสริมป้องกันขอบ; การ์ดเฉพาะสำหรับฟิกเกอร์สเก็ต; การ์ดพลาสติกแข็ง; การ์ดเฉพาะสำหรับฮอกกี้สเก็ต; ที่หุ้มใบมีดรูปสัตว์ผ้าพลัฌ; การ์ดชิ้นเดียวแบบสแน็ปออน; ที่หุ้มใบมีดผ้าเทอร์รีนุ่ม; การ์ดแบบสปริงโหลด; การ์ดสำหรับเดินทาง; การ์ดอเนกประสงค์; อื่นๆ
zh-CN: 防护方式: 可调节塑料护套; 可调节两件式护套; 刀刃保护垫片; 花样滑冰鞋专用护套; 硬塑料护套; 冰球鞋专用护套; 毛绒动物吸水套; 卡扣式一体护套; 柔软毛巾布吸水套; 弹簧护套; 旅行护套; 通用护套; 其他
el: Στυλ προστατευτικού: Ρυθμιζόμενο πλαστικό προστατευτικό; Ρυθμιζόμενο προστατευτικό δύο τεμαχίων; Ένθετο προστασίας άκρων; Προστατευτικό ειδικά για παγοπέδιλα καλλιτεχνικού πατινάζ; Προστατευτικό από σκληρό πλαστικό; Προστατευτικό ειδικά για παγοπέδιλα χόκεϊ; Κάλυμμα από λούτρινο ζωάκι; Κουμπωτό προστατευτικό ενός τεμαχίου; Μαλακό κάλυμμα φροτέ; Προστατευτικό με ελατήριο; Προστατευτικό ταξιδιού; Προστατευτικό γενικής εφαρμογής; Άλλο
hu: Védőburkolat stílusa: Állítható műanyag élvédő; Állítható kétrészes élvédő; Élvédő betét; Műkorcsolya-specifikus élvédő; Kemény műanyag élvédő; Jégkorongkorcsolya-specifikus élvédő; Plüssállatos pengevédő (soaker); Pattintós egyrészes élvédő; Puha frottír pengevédő (soaker); Rugós élvédő; Utazó élvédő; Univerzális élvédő; Egyéb
lt-LT: Apsaugos stilius: Reguliuojama plastikinė apsauga; Reguliuojama dviejų dalių apsauga; Kraštų apsaugos įdėklas; Dailiojo čiuožimo pačiūžų apsauga; Kieto plastiko apsauga; Ledo ritulio pačiūžų apsauga; Pliušinė apsauga drėgmei sugerti; Užspaudžiama vientisa apsauga; Minkšto kilpinio audinio apsauga drėgmei sugerti; Spyruoklinė apsauga; Kelioninė apsauga; Universali apsauga; Kita
fr: Style de protection: Protège-lame en plastique réglable; Protège-lame réglable en deux pièces; Insert de protection des bords; Protège-lame spécifique aux patins artistiques; Protège-lame en plastique rigide; Protège-lame spécifique aux patins de hockey; Protège-lame en peluche animale; Protège-lame monobloc à encliqueter; Protège-lame en tissu éponge doux; Protège-lame à ressort; Protège-lame de voyage; Protège-lame à ajustement universel; Autre
ru: Тип защиты: Регулируемый пластиковый чехол; Регулируемый двухсоставной чехол; Вставка для защиты лезвия; Чехол для фигурных коньков; Жесткий пластиковый чехол; Чехол для хоккейных коньков; Мягкий чехол-игрушка; Цельный чехол на защелке; Мягкий махровый чехол; Чехол на пружине; Транспортировочный чехол; Универсальный чехол; Другое
hr-HR: Stil straže: Podesivi plastični štitnik; Podesivi dvodijelni štitnik; Umetak za zaštitu oštrica; Štitnik specifičan za umjetničke klizaljke; Štitnik od tvrde plastike; Štitnik specifičan za hokejaške klizaljke; Plišana navlaka u obliku životinje; Jednodijelni štitnik na kopčanje; Mekana frotirna navlaka; Štitnik s oprugom; Putni štitnik; Štitnik univerzalne veličine; Ostalo
zh-TW: 護刀套樣式: 可調式塑膠護罩; 可調式兩件式護罩; 邊緣保護嵌件; 花式溜冰鞋專用護套; 硬質塑膠護罩; 冰上曲棍球鞋專用護套; 絨毛動物吸水護套; 卡扣式單件護套; 柔軟毛巾布吸水護套; 彈簧式護罩; 旅行護罩; 通用護套; 其他
nb: Vaktstil: Justerbar plastbeskytter; Justerbar todelt beskytter; Kantbeskytterinnlegg; Beskytter for kunstløpskøyter; Beskytter i hardplast; Beskytter for hockeyskøyter; Myk skøytebeskytter (dyrefigur); Éndelt beskytter som klikkes på; Myk frottébeskytter; Fjærbelastet beskytter; Reisebeskytter; Universell beskytter; Annet
ko: 가드 스타일: 조절형 플라스틱 가드; 조절형 2피스 가드; 에지 프로텍터 인서트; 피겨 스케이트 전용 가드; 하드 플라스틱 가드; 하키 스케이트 전용 가드; 플러시 동물 인형 소커; 스냅온 원피스 가드; 소프트 테리 소커; 스프링 장착 가드; 여행용 가드; 범용 핏 가드; 기타
pt-BR: Protetor estilo: Protetor de plástico ajustável; Protetor ajustável de duas peças; Inserto de proteção de borda; Protetor específico para patins artísticos; Protetor de plástico rígido; Protetor específico para patins de hóquei; Capa absorvente de pelúcia (animal); Protetor de peça única de encaixe; Capa absorvente de tecido felpudo; Protetor com mola; Protetor para viagem; Protetor de ajuste universal; Outro
de: Stil des Schutzes: Anpassbarer Kunststoffschutz; Anpassbarer zweiteiliger Schutz; Kantenschutz-Einsatz; Eiskunstlauf-spezifischer Schutz; Hartkunststoffschutz; Eishockey-spezifischer Schutz; Plüschtier-Schoner; Einteiliger Snap-on-Schutz; Weicher Frottee-Schoner; Federbelasteter Schutz; Reiseschutz; Universalschutz; Sonstige
en: Guard style: Adjustable Plastic Guard; Adjustable Two-Piece Guard; Edge Protector Insert; Figure Skate-Specific Guard; Hard Plastic Guard; Hockey Skate-Specific Guard; Plush Animal Soaker; Snap-On One-Piece Guard; Soft Terry Soaker; Spring-Loaded Guard; Travel Guard; Universal Fit Guard; Other
sl-SI: Slog ščitnika: Prilagodljiv plastični ščitnik; Prilagodljiv dvodelni ščitnik; Vložek za zaščito robov; Ščitnik za umetnostne drsalke; Ščitnik iz trde plastike; Ščitnik za hokejske drsalke; Plišasta zaščita v obliki živali za vpijanje vlage; Enodelni ščitnik na pripenjanje; Mehka zaščita iz frotirja za vpijanje vlage; Ščitnik na vzmet; Potovalni ščitnik; Univerzalni ščitnik; Drugo
nl: Beschermer stijl: Verstelbare plastic beschermer; Verstelbare tweedelige beschermer; Inzetstuk randbeschermer; Specifieke beschermer voor kunstschaatsen; Harde plastic beschermer; Specifieke beschermer voor ijshockeyschaatsen; Pluchen dieren-soaker; Eendelige snap-on-beschermer; Zachte badstof-soaker; Verende beschermer; Reisbeschermer; Universele beschermer; Overig
it: Stile di guardia: Protezione in plastica regolabile; Protezione a due pezzi regolabile; Inserto salvafilo; Protezione specifica per pattini di figura; Protezione in plastica rigida; Protezione specifica per pattini da hockey; Coprilama in peluche a forma di animale; Protezione monopezzo a scatto; Coprilama in spugna morbida; Protezione a molla; Protezione da viaggio; Protezione a vestibilità universale; Altro
cs: Styl chrániče: Nastavitelný plastový chránič; Nastavitelný dvoudílný chránič; Vložka pro ochranu hran; Chránič na krasobrusle; Chránič z tvrdého plastu; Chránič na hokejové brusle; Plyšový zvířecí návlek; Zacvakávací jednodílný chránič; Měkký froté návlek; Pružinový chránič; Cestovní chránič; Univerzální chránič; Ostatní
es: Estilo de protección: Protector de plástico ajustable; Protector de dos piezas ajustable; Inserto protector de bordes; Protector específico para patinaje artístico; Protector de plástico rígido; Protector específico para patines de hockey; Funda absorbente de animal de peluche; Protector de una pieza a presión; Funda absorbente de felpa suave; Protector con resorte; Protector de viaje; Protector de ajuste universal; Otro
bg-BG: Стил на предпазителя: Регулируем пластмасов предпазител; Регулируем предпазител от две части; Вложка за предпазване на ръбовете; Предпазител за фигурни кънки; Твърд пластмасов предпазител; Предпазител за хокейни кънки; Плюшен калъф с животно; Закопчаващ се предпазител от една част; Мек хавлиен калъф; Пружинен предпазител; Предпазител за пътуване; Универсален предпазител; Други
vi: Kiểu bảo vệ: Lớp bảo vệ bằng nhựa có thể điều chỉnh; Lớp bảo vệ 2 mảnh có thể điều chỉnh; Miếng đệm bảo vệ mép; Lớp bảo vệ chuyên dụng cho giày trượt băng nghệ thuật; Lớp bảo vệ bằng nhựa cứng; Lớp bảo vệ chuyên dụng cho giày trượt băng khúc côn cầu; Vỏ bọc thấm hút hình thú nhồi bông; Lớp bảo vệ nguyên khối dạng cài; Vỏ bọc thấm hút bằng vải bông xù mềm; Lớp bảo vệ dùng lò xo; Lớp bảo vệ khi đi du lịch; Lớp bảo vệ vạn năng; Khác
ro-RO: Stilul de protecție: Protecție reglabilă din plastic; Protecție reglabilă din două piese; Inserție pentru protecția marginilor; Protecție specifică pentru patine artistice; Protecție din plastic dur; Protecție specifică pentru patine de hochei; Protecție din pluș cu animale; Protecție dintr-o singură piesă cu prindere rapidă; Protecție moale din frotir; Protecție cu arc; Protecție pentru călătorie; Protecție universală; Altele